Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-244
Certificate or agreement; execution or filing by judicial act.

(a) If a person required by sections 67-240 to 67-243 to execute or file any certificate fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the district court to direct the execution or filing of the certificate. If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute or file the certificate, it shall order the Secretary of State to execute and record an appropriate certificate.

(b) If a person required to execute a partnership agreement or amendment of an agreement fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the district court to direct the execution of the partnership agreement or amendment of the agreement. If the court finds that the partnership agreement or amendment should be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to do so, it shall enter an order granting appropriate relief.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 17.